Idaho, session 2025, H0059.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 13, Title 54, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 13
MEDICAL ETHICS DEFENSE ACT
54-1301. SHORT TITLE. This act shall be known and may be cited as the
"Medical Ethics Defense Act."
54-1302. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND PURPOSE. (1) The legislature finds
that the right of conscience is a fundamental and inalienable right. It was
central to the founding of the United States, has been deeply rooted in the
nation's history and tradition for centuries, and has been central to the
practice of medicine, through the Hippocratic oath, for millennia.
(2) Despite its preeminent importance, however, threats to the right
of conscience of health care professionals, health care institutions, and
health care payers have become increasingly common and severe in recent
years. The swift pace of scientific advancement and the expansion of medical
capabilities, along with the creation of new rights for patients to access
certain procedures and the mistaken notion that health care professionals,
health care institutions, and health care payers are mere public utilities,
promise to make the current crisis worse, unless something is done to secure
the right of conscience.
(3) With this purpose in mind, the legislature declares that it is the
public policy of the state of Idaho to protect the right of conscience for
health care professionals, health care institutions, and health care pay-
ers.
(4) As the right of conscience is fundamental, no health care profes-
sional, health care institution, or health care payer should be required to
participate in or pay for any medical procedure, treatment, or service, or
prescribe or pay for any medication, to which he objects on the basis of con-
science, whether such conscience is informed by religious, moral, or ethical
beliefs or principles.


(5) It is the purpose of this chapter to protect health care profes-
sionals, health care institutions, and health care payers from discrimina-
tion, punishment, and retaliation as a result of any instance of conscien-
tious medical objection.
54-1303. DEFINITIONS. For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Conscience" means the ethical, moral, or religious beliefs or
principles sincerely held by any health care provider. Conscience with
respect to institutional entities or corporate bodies, as opposed to in-
dividual persons, is determined by reference to that entity's or body's
governing documents, including but not limited to any published ethical,
moral, or religious guidelines or directives, mission statements, constitu-
tions, articles of incorporation, bylaws, policies, or regulations.
(2) "Discrimination" or "discriminated against" means any adverse
action taken against, or any threat of adverse action communicated to, any
health care provider as a result of exercising rights pursuant to sections
54-1304 and 54-1305, Idaho Code. Discrimination includes but is not limited
to any penalty or disciplinary or retaliatory action, whether executed or
threatened. Discrimination does not include the negotiation or purchase of,
or the refusal to use or purchase, insurance or medical procedures, treat-
ments, or services by an individual or nongovernmental entity, nor does it
include good faith efforts to reasonably accommodate conscientious objec-
tions of a health care provider.
(3) "Essential functions" means the fundamental job duties of an em-
ployment position. A function can be essential if, among other things, the
position exists specifically to perform that function, there are a limited
number of other employees who could perform the function, or the function is
specialized and the individual is hired based on his ability to perform the
function. The term does not include the marginal functions of a position.
(4) "Health care institution" means any organization, corporation,
partnership, association, agency, network, sole proprietorship, joint
venture, or other entity that provides medical procedures, treatments, or
services.
(5) "Health care payer" means any employer, health plan, health mainte-
nance organization, insurance company, or management services organization
or any other entity that pays for any medical procedure, treatment, or ser-
vice provided to any patient or client, including to contract for, arrange
for payment of, reimburse, or remunerate, whether payment is made in whole or
in part.
(6) "Health care professional" means any person who is authorized to
participate in any way in any medical procedure, treatment, or service. This
includes but is not limited to:
(a) Doctors;
(b) Nurses;
(c) Clinical nurse specialists;
(d) Nurse aides;
(e) Physician assistants;
(f) Medical assistants;
(g) Allied health professionals;
(h) Employees of a hospital, clinic, nursing home, or pharmacy;


(i) Pharmacists and pharmacy technicians;
(j) Faculty and students of a medical school, nursing school, or school
of psychology or counseling;
(k) Medical researchers and laboratory technicians;
(l) Psychologists, psychiatrists, and counselors; and
(m) Social workers.
(7) "Health care provider" means a health care professional, health
care institution, or health care payer.
(8) "Medical procedure, treatment, or service" means medical research
or health care provided to any patient or client at any time over the course
of treatment. This includes but is not limited to testing, diagnosis,
record-making, referral, prescribing, dispensing, or administering any
drug, medication, or device, therapy or counseling, and preparation or ar-
rangement for a surgical procedure.
(9) "Participate" means to provide, perform, assist with, facilitate,
refer for, counsel for, advise to pursue, admit for the purposes of provid-
ing, or take part in any way in providing any medical procedure, treatment,
or service.
54-1304. RIGHT OF CONSCIENCE OF HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS. (1) Health care
providers shall have the right of conscience and, pursuant to this right,
shall not be required to participate in or pay for a medical procedure,
treatment, or service that violates such health care provider's conscience.
(2) The exercise of the right of conscience is limited to conscience-
based objections to a particular medical procedure, treatment, or service.
This section may not be construed to waive or modify any duty a health care
provider may have to provide or pay for medical procedures, treatments, or
services that do not violate the provider's conscience.
(3) A health care professional shall communicate to the health care
professional's employer a conscience-based objection when it occurs or as
soon as reasonably possible to allow an employer to make necessary staffing
adjustments without delaying the provision of health care services. Nothing
in this chapter shall prevent an employer from requiring an employee to dis-
close the employee's conscience-based objections at the time of hiring, but
such disclosure shall not limit the rights protected by this chapter.
(4) Conscience-based objections shall be provided in writing by an em-
ployee if requested by the employer.
(5) A health care payer shall not decline payment for a medical proce-
dure, treatment, or service that it is contractually obligated to pay for un-
der the terms of its contract with an insured party.
(6) No health care provider shall be discriminated against in any man-
ner as a result of exercising the right of conscience pursuant to subsection
(1) of this section.
(7) No health care provider shall be civilly, criminally, or adminis-
tratively liable for exercising the right of conscience described in subsec-
tion (1) of this section, and no health care institution shall be civilly,
criminally, or administratively liable for the exercise of the right of con-
science described in subsection (1) of this section by a health care profes-
sional employed, contracted, or granted admitting privileges by the health
care institution.


(8) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impede the right of a
religious health care provider to make employment, staffing, contracting,
administrative, and admitting privilege decisions consistent with such
health care provider's religious beliefs if such health care provider holds
itself out to the public as religious and has internal operating policies or
procedures that implement its religious purpose or mission.
(9) To the extent that this chapter provides broader rights of con-
science than that provided by section 18-611, Idaho Code, this chapter
controls over section 18-611, Idaho Code. To the extent that this chapter
is not enforceable with respect to any rights of conscience protected by
section 18-611, Idaho Code, then section 18-611, Idaho Code, shall control.
(10) Nothing in this chapter shall affect the rights of conscience pro-
vided for in section 18-612, Idaho Code, to the extent that those rights are
broader in scope than those provided for in this chapter.
(11) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to override the require-
ment to provide emergency medical treatment to all patients as set forth in
42 U.S.C. 1395dd.
(12) The protections in this chapter shall not apply if an employee is
unable to perform any essential function, the employer cannot transfer the
employee to a suitable alternative position for which the employee is quali-
fied, and the employer is otherwise unable to reasonably accommodate the em-
ployee without imposing an undue hardship on the employer.
(13) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as providing a health
care provider with civil immunity for the failure to comply with the applica-
ble community standard of care as described in section 6-1012, Idaho Code.
54-1305. WHISTLEBLOWER PROTECTION. (1) No health care provider shall
be discriminated against in any manner because the health care provider:
(a) Provided, caused to be provided, or is about to provide or cause to
be provided information relating to any act or omission the health care
provider reasonably believes to be a violation of any provision of this
chapter to a health care professional's employer, the attorney general
of Idaho, any state agency charged with protecting health care rights of
conscience, the United States department of health and human services
office of civil rights, or any other federal agency charged with pro-
tecting health care rights of conscience; or
(b) Testified, assisted, or participated, or is about to testify, as-
sist, or participate in a proceeding concerning such violation.
(2) Unless the disclosure is specifically prohibited by law, no health
care provider shall be discriminated against in any manner because the
health care provider disclosed any information that the health care provider
reasonably believes evinces:
(a) Any violation of any law, rule, or regulation;
(b) Any violation of any ethical guidelines for the provision of any
medical procedure or service; or
(c) Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of authority,
practices, or methods of treatment that may put patient health at risk,
or a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply when the disclosure
concerns the lawful exercise of discretionary decision-making authority


unless the health care provider reasonably believes that the disclosure
evinces a violation or misconduct listed in subsection (2) of this section.
54-1306. FREE SPEECH PROTECTION FOR HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS. (1) The de-
partment of health and welfare, the state board of medicine, or any other
department or board regulating the practice of a medical procedure, treat-
ment, or service in the state may not reprimand or sanction a health care
provider or deny or revoke or threaten to deny or revoke a license, certi-
fication, or registration of a health care provider for engaging in speech,
expression, or association that is protected from government interference
by the first amendment to the United States constitution, unless the depart-
ment or board demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that the health
care provider's speech, expression, or association was the direct cause of
physical harm to a person with whom the health care provider had a practi-
tioner-patient relationship within the three (3) years immediately preced-
ing the incident of physical harm.
(2) The department of health and welfare, the state board of medicine,
or any other department or board regulating the practice of a medical proce-
dure, treatment, or service in the state shall not contract with, nor shall
it recognize, approve, or require an individual to obtain certifications or
credentials issued or approved by, a specialty board or other recognizing
agency that revokes the certification of, or refuses to issue certification
to, an individual because the individual has engaged in speech, expression,
or association that is protected from government interference by the first
amendment to the United States constitution, provided such individual was
not providing medical advice or treatment to a specific patient.
(3) The department of health and welfare, the state board of medicine,
or any other department or board regulating the practice of a medical proce-
dure, treatment, or service in the state shall provide a health care provider
with any complaints it has received that are based on speech, expression,
or association that is protected from government interference by the first
amendment to the United States constitution and may result in the revoca-
tion of the health care provider's license, certification, or registration,
within twenty-one (21) days after receipt of the complaint. The department
or board shall pay the health care provider an administrative penalty of
five hundred dollars ($500) for each day the complaint is not provided to the
health care provider after the specified twenty-one (21) days.
54-1307. CIVIL REMEDIES. (1) A cause of action for damages or injunc-
tive relief, or both, may be brought by any health care provider for any vi-
olation of any provision of this chapter. Any additional burden or expense
on another health care professional, health care institution, or health care
payer arising from the exercise of the right of conscience shall not be a de-
fense to any violation of this chapter. However, no cause of action may be
brought against an individual who declines to use or purchase a medical pro-
cedure or services from a specific health care professional, health care in-
stitution, or health care payer for exercising the rights granted in sec-
tions 54-1304(1), 54-1305, and 54-1306, Idaho Code.
(2) Any party aggrieved by any violation of this chapter may commence a
civil action and shall be entitled, upon the finding of a violation, to:


(a) Injunctive relief, when appropriate, including but not limited to
reinstatement of a health care professional's previous position, rein-
statement of board certification, and relicensure of a health care in-
stitution or health care payer;
(b) Actual damages for injuries suffered; and
(c) Reasonable costs and attorney's fees.
(3) Such damages shall be cumulative and in no way limited by any other
remedies that may be available under any other federal, state, or municipal
law.
54-1308. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this chapter are hereby de-
clared to be severable and if any provision of this chapter or the applica-
tion of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for
any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining
portions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.